src/esu.lexc
–r̲pag|@²vag                 ! big N; large N
+a|+aar                     ! to V repeatedly
@+–`(g)ar(ar)te             ! to suddenly or immediately V; to V with short duration of action
@⁵+cete|.vkar               ! to let, allow, permit, cause, or compel one to V
+ciqe|@⁵ciiqe               ! to V in the future; will V
('a)                        ! used for [DemAdv][Loc] %~nete 
@+(r|l)i                    ! to become or cause to become V
@%:~(ng)ạ                   ! Consequential Mood @ for te->c and te°->l
@–ngr(ar)                   ! Concessive Mood @ for te unchanged and te°->le
@nga                        ! to be in a state of having V-ed; or having been V-ed
@³%:(u)cir|@⁵cir            ! condition of possessor with respect to V; incidence of V; occurrence of V
–r̲(ur)lur                   ! poor dear N ; to V (of poor, dear one)


!!!!!!! Multiple Forms !!!!!!
[e]                         ! weak e initial bases - optional e used for prosody
!(a)                         ! non-Yup'ik bases
!(aa)                        ! 
(ar)                        ! (aq*)/(ar*)/(ar) - NounDicForm/NounBaseForm/VerbBaseForm
(ar*)                       ! (aq*)/(ar*)/(ar) - NounDicForm/NounBaseForm/VerbBaseForm
! (ur)                        ! only in –r̲(ur)lur above


!!!!!!! ALLOMORPH OPERATORS !!!!!!
(e)                         ! is used only when a strong base-final consonant is kept
(g)                         ! is used with bases ending in two vowels
(ng)                        ! is used with bases ending in a vowel
(r)                         ! is used with bases ending in te, and by some speakers in e not preceded by t
(s)                         ! is used with bases ending in a vowel
(t)                         ! is used with bases ending in a consonant
(u)                         ! is used with bases ending in a consonant or e
(g|t)                       ! (g)(t) 
(r|l)                       ! @+(r/l)i-1 to become or cause to become V # used with adjectival verbs; the r is used with bases ending in a prime vowel, and the l with bases ending in e (but (special) te changes to l)
(u|i)                       ! consonant and e-ending bases (not te) use u ; te bases use i

!!!!!!! OPERATORS !!!!!!
! +                         ! keep final consonants of bases
! –                         ! drop final consonants of bases
! ~                         ! drop final e from bases
! %                         ! keep "strong" final consonants, drop "weak" final consonants
! :                         ! drop voiced velar continuant if they occur between single vowels
! '                         ! suffix causes gemination for bases of the form (C)VCe-
! .                         ! no change to either base or suffix at the juncture
! @                         ! te ending bases dependent suffix
@¹                          ! (@n postbase) drops t only when the t is preceded by a fricative; the fricative is then written devoiced
@²                          ! (@i|m|ng|t|v) drops t when the t is preceded by a fricative which is then written devoiced, and changes t to s (y in HBC) when the t is preceded by a vowel, unless the base is marked with °, in which case t is changed to l
@³                          ! (@(u)c|t) drops t when the t is preceded by a fricative which then becomes voiced, and changes t to y if preceded by a vowel, but to s (except in HBC) if the t is geminated on the base, unless the base is marked with °, in which case t is changed to l
@⁴                          ! (@ng|k|t) changes t to s (y in HBC) whether preceded by a vowel or fricative, unless the base is marked with °, in whcih case t is changed to l
@⁵                          ! (@c|l|ll|k|ng|p|t) drops any t
@ˡ                          ! (@l postbases) tl->ll
@ˁ                          ! (@ur postbases) te->q                    
@ʸ                          ! (@y postbases) ty->c 
! *                         ! base final r marked with asterisk to indicate "strong" base
! °                         ! special te
k̲ q̲ g̲ r̲ g̲g̲ r̲r̲               ! velar/uvular (front/back velar) assimilation


!!! Other !!!
! ʼ modifier letter indicating gemination, automatic gemination and automatic devoicing separator, separator for nʼg

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Root
    Exceptions      ;
    NonYupikBase    ;
    Particle        ;
    Ignorative      ;
    ProperNoun      ;
    NounBase        ;
    VerbBase        ;
    DimensionalRoot ;
    PosturalRoot    ;
    EmotionalRoot   ; 
    PersonalPronoun ;
    QuantQual       ;
    Demonstrative   ;
    Positional      ;
    Numeral         ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Exceptions              !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NonYupikBase
< [a:A|b:B|c:C|d:D|e:E|f:F|g:G|h:H|i:I|j:J|k:K|l:L|m:M|n:N|o:O|p:P|q:Q|r:R|s:S|t:T|u:U|v:V|w:W|x:X|y:Y|z:Z|vv:Vv|ll:Ll|ss:Ss|gg:Gg|rr:Rr|ng:Ng|n͞g:N͞g|u͡g:U͡g|u͡gg:U͡gg|u͡r:U͡r|u͡rr:U͡rr|m̄:M̄|n̄:N̄]+ %[NonYupik%]:0 >    NonYupikPostbase;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Particles               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                       !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ParticleEnd
[Particle]:              EncliticOrEnd;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!               Ignorative Words                  !!!!!!
!!!!!!          (for Interrogative Mood)               !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VerbSpecialT
:°                     VerbPostbase; ! te°


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!     Derivational Morphemes Applied To Nouns / Derived Bases     !!!!!!
!!!!!!                                                                 !!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!


LEXICON NonYupikPostbase
-=+r[N→N]:=r                                   NounPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(a)r[N→N]:=ar                               NounPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(aa)r[N→N]:=aar                             NounPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing

-=+r[V→V]:=r                                   VerbPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(a)r[V→V]:=ar                               VerbPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing
-=+(aa)r[V→V]:=aar                             VerbPostbase; ! used with English words when they are used in Yupʼik speech or writing

!-+(a)r[N→V]:+(a)r                             VerbPostbase; ! to say or “go”. . . (word or sound)

LEXICON Particle
agurrluk                 ParticleEnd; ! not ever; never
akleng                   ParticleEnd; ! poor thing!
ak'arpak                 ParticleEnd; ! forever; since very long ago
allamtaunek              ParticleEnd; ! occuring one after the other
amci                     ParticleEnd; ! hurry up!, letʼs go!
angurrluk                ParticleEnd; ! absolutely not; in no case; certainly not
arcassi                  ParticleEnd; ! wow!
atakuq                   ParticleEnd; ! (this) evening (noun (especially when with final q) and adverbial particle)
ata'a                    ParticleEnd; ! let me see; well then
cali                     ParticleEnd; ! more; furthermore; again; also; still; yet; and
cuna=gguq                ParticleEnd; ! and so; apparently
elliinginaq              ParticleEnd; ! in vain; without purpose
gguun                    ParticleEnd; ! through here; this way
ii=i                     ParticleEnd; ! yes; youʼre welcome
ik'itmun                 ParticleEnd; ! toward or in ugly (improper) ways
iq                       ParticleEnd; ! exclamatory particle ‘I canʼt believe it!ʼ
kavirpak                 ParticleEnd; ! all red; very red
kiiki                    ParticleEnd; ! hurry!
maa=i                    ParticleEnd; ! here; coming this way; now; at the present time
nallutmun                ParticleEnd; ! in ignorance; not knowing
perrirpak                ParticleEnd; ! completely clean
qaterpak                 ParticleEnd; ! very white; all white
taayam                   ParticleEnd; ! come! # exclamatory particle; < taa=am
tau͡ga=i                  ParticleEnd; ! thatʼs enough; well then; and then; thatʼs all
tuaten                   ParticleEnd; ! like that
unuaquaqan               ParticleEnd; ! daily; every day
wall'                    ParticleEnd; ! or
watuacetun               ParticleEnd; ! like nowadays
LEXICON VerbBase
alaite                 VerbSpecialT; ! to be visible or audible; to be here, present and available (being perceptable)
amataite               VerbSpecialT; ! to have no meaning
angayiite              VerbSpecialT; ! to suffer motion sickness; to be seasick
aryuqaite              VerbSpecialT; ! (in HBC) to be disrespectful toward relatives, visitors, or friends; to be overly forward; to lack scrupples in oneʼs relations to others
asvaite                VerbSpecialT; ! to be solid; to be stable; to be immovable
ayuquciite             VerbSpecialT; ! to be confused; to be puzzled; to be bewildered; to not know what something is like
cangallrunrite         VerbSpecialT; ! to be no less than or more than another or others; to be no different from another or others
can'ggete              VerbSpecialT; ! to be thin
cataite                VerbSpecialT; ! to be absent
cugkite                VerbSpecialT; ! to be short in stature
ellangeksaite          VerbSpecialT; ! to (still) be in a coma or otherwise unconscious
eprite                 VerbSpecialT; ! to be clean
ilaniite               VerbSpecialT; ! to be a poor companion
ipegcete               VerbSpecialT; ! to be sharp
irlaite                VerbSpecialT; ! to be generous
kasnguite              VerbSpecialT; ! to be shameless
kenercete              VerbSpecialT; ! to be of such a nature as to impede motion; to be viscous; to be rough-surfaced
kiircete               VerbSpecialT; ! to be hot
maqarcete              VerbSpecialT; ! to be warm
mianiite               VerbSpecialT; ! to not be a gentle person; to lack sensitivity to the pain that one inflicts on another person
nakriate               VerbSpecialT; ! to be crooked; to be unlucky at catching game
nepaite                VerbSpecialT; ! to be silent; to be quiet
nuniite                VerbSpecialT; ! to be restless; to be troubled
piiragcete             VerbSpecialT; ! to be slick; to be frictionless
qakircite              VerbSpecialT; ! (HBC form) to be pale; to be dry; to be bleached
qetute                 VerbSpecialT; ! to be soft; to be pudding-like
tanqiate               VerbSpecialT; ! to be dim; to lack brightness
uluryaite              VerbSpecialT; ! to not fear getting hit; to not cringe; to be cruel
urenkenrite            VerbSpecialT; ! to be busy; to have no time for (it)
